North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-07.1 Vocational Training and Work Evaluation Programs

65-07.1-01.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

“Employee” means a participant in a vocational training or work evaluation program when the request of the sponsoring agency or organization has been approved by the organization under subsection 2. The participant shall not be deemed to be employed in hazardous employment.

“Employer” means any agency or organization that sponsors a participant in a vocational training or work evaluation program when such designation has been requested by the agency or organization and has been approved by the organization.

“Workstation” means any person, corporation, limited liability company, or agency who through a formal contract with a sponsoring agency or organization is furnishing facilities, tools, or instruction to any participant in a vocational training or work evaluation program.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 585, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

Cross-References.

Word defined by statute always has same meaning, see N.D.C.C. § 1-01-09.

Collateral References.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents associated with chemistry experiments, shopwork and manual or vocational training, 35 A.L.R.3d 758.

65-07.1-02.
Vocational training or work evaluation programs — Organization may contract.

Whenever an agency or organization has been approved as an employer under subsection 2 of section 65-07.1-01, the organization may contract with the agency or organization for the coverage of participants in a program of vocational training or work evaluation. The premium for the coverage must be based on a reasonable wage or fee as determined by the organization for employees in the same class of industry that the employer is engaged.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 585, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2013, ch. 502, § 8.

65-07.1-03.
Employer and workstation not liable for civil damages — Employee may elect.

Any employer or workstation, as defined in this chapter, shall not be liable to respond in damages at common law or by statute for injuries to or the death of any employee, as defined in this chapter, whenever the employer has complied with the provisions of this chapter and during the period for which premiums, as set by the organization, have been paid. Any employee who elects, before injury or death, not to come under the provisions of this chapter may do so by notifying the organization, employer, and workstation of such election in writing.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 585, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-07.1-04.
Benefits — Filing procedures.

In the event that the organization has contracted with a sponsoring agency or organization to provide such coverage, any participant in a vocational training or work evaluation program who suffers an injury or disease as defined in section 65-01-02, while in the course of such participation shall be entitled to such medical, surgical, and hospital benefits and supplies as the nature of the injury may require. In addition, the organization shall provide such other benefits, to the extent as provided or limited by this title, as are specifically set out in the contract with the sponsoring agency or organization. All original claims shall be filed within such time and in accordance with such procedures as provided in chapter 65-05.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 585, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.